Maryland, session 2025, HB0747.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
9–11A–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) (1) “On–site wastewater system” means:
(i) A wastewater system designed to treat and dispose of effluent on:
1. The same property that produces the wastewater; or
2. An easement; or
(ii) A holding tank.
(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, “on–site
wastewater system” includes a septic or any other on–site sewage disposal system.
(3) “On–site wastewater system” does not include a wastewater treatment
system that:
(i) Requires a discharge permit from the Department; or
(ii) Treats 5,000 or more gallons per day.
Article – Real Property
8–121.

HOUSE BILL 747 3
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “ON–SITE WASTEWATER SYSTEM” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 9–11A–01 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DELEGATED APPROVAL AUTHORITY” MEANS THE LOCAL
HEALTH DEPARTMENT OR COUNTY AGENCY THAT HAS RECEIVED AN ON–SITE
SEWAGE DISPOSAL SYSTEM DELEGATION OF AUTHORITY BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(3) “ON–SITE WASTEWATER SYSTEM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
9–11A–01 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(B) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026 JULY 1, 2028, AND BEFORE EACH NEW
TENANT OCCUPIES THE PROPERTY THEREAFTER, A LANDLORD OF PROPERTY THAT
IS SERVED BY AN ON–SITE WASTEWATER SYSTEM SHALL ENSURE THAT THE SYSTEM
HAS BEEN:
(1) INSPECTED BY AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS LICENSED UNDER TITLE 9,
SUBTITLE 11A OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE TO PERFORM PROPERTY TRANSFER
INSPECTIONS FOR ON–SITE WASTEWATER SYSTEMS; AND
(2) PUMPED OUT BY AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS LICENSED UNDER TITLE
9, SUBTITLE 11A OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE TO PERFORM PUMPING SERVICES
FOR ON–SITE WASTEWATER SYSTEMS.
(C) FOR PURPOSES OF MEETING THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER SUBSECTION
(B) OF THIS SECTION, A PROPERTY TRANSFER INSPECTION OR PUMPING SERVICE
PERFORMED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION IS VALID FOR
3 YEARS.
(D) IF AN INSPECTION UNDER THIS SECTION IDENTIFIES A FAILING ON–SITE
WASTEWATER SYSTEM, THE LANDLORD OF THE PROPERTY SHALL NOTIFY THE
DELEGATED APPROVAL AUTHORITY:
(1) ABOUT THE FAILURE; AND
(2) WHEN THE SYSTEM IS FIXED.
10–715.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “ON–SITE WASTEWATER SYSTEM” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 9–11A–01 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 747
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DELEGATED APPROVAL AUTHORITY” MEANS THE LOCAL
HEALTH DEPARTMENT OR COUNTY AGENCY THAT HAS RECEIVED AN ON–SITE
SEWAGE DISPOSAL SYSTEM DELEGATION OF AUTHORITY BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(3) “ON–SITE WASTEWATER SYSTEM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
9–11A–01 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(B) THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION DO NOT APPLY IF:
(1) (I) 1. THE PROPERTY TRANSFER INVOLVES THE TRANSFER
OF RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY THAT IS BETWEEN:
1. A. CURRENT SPOUSES;
2. B. A PARENT AND A CHILD; OR
3. C. SIBLINGS, BY WHOLE BLOOD, IF THE PROPERTY
IS HELD IN TRUST;
(II) 2. THE PROPERTY’S MORTGAGE IS BEING REFINANCED;
OR
(III) 3. THE CHANGE IN OWNERSHIP OR FORM OF
OWNERSHIP DOES NOT INVOLVE THE INTRODUCTION OF NEW PARTIES; AND
(2) (II) THE ON–SITE WASTEWATER SYSTEM HAS BEEN INSPECTED
WITHIN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 5–YEAR PERIOD; OR
(2) THE PROPERTY TRANSFER IS THE INITIAL TRANSFER AFTER
CONSTRUCTION OF THE PROPERTY.
(C) (1) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2026 JULY 1, 2028, A CONTRACT FOR
THE SALE OF REAL PROPERTY THAT IS SERVED BY AN ON–SITE WASTEWATER
SYSTEM SHALL INCLUDE A PROVISION REQUIRING, AS A CONDITION OF THE SALE,
THAT THE PURCHASER ENSURE THAT THE SYSTEM HAS BEEN:
(I) INSPECTED BY AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS LICENSED UNDER
TITLE 9, SUBTITLE 11A OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE TO PERFORM PROPERTY
TRANSFER INSPECTIONS FOR ON–SITE WASTEWATER SYSTEMS; AND

HOUSE BILL 747 5
(II) PUMPED OUT BY AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS LICENSED UNDER
TITLE 9, SUBTITLE 11A OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE TO PERFORM PUMPING
SERVICES FOR ON–SITE WASTEWATER SYSTEMS.
(2) (I) SETTLEMENT ON THE CONTRACT FOR THE SALE OF THE
REAL PROPERTY MAY NOT OCCUR UNTIL THE VENDOR AND THE PURCHASER
RECEIVE A REPORT ON THE PROPERTY TRANSFER INSPECTION PERFORMED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND CONFIRMATION OF THE PUMPING
SERVICE PERFORMED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(II) AT SETTLEMENT ON THE CONTRACT FOR THE SALE OF THE
REAL PROPERTY, THE VENDOR AND THE PURCHASER SHALL EACH CERTIFY IN
WRITING THAT THEY HAVE RECEIVED AND REVIEWED THE REPORT AND
CONFIRMATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(C) (D) UNLESS OTHERWISE REQUIRED AS PART OF A REAL ESTATE
CONTRACT OR MORTGAGE REQUIREMENT, FOR PURPOSES OF MEETING THE
REQUIREMENTS UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(1) (C)(1) OF THIS SECTION, A PROPERTY
TRANSFER INSPECTION OR PUMPING SERVICE PERFORMED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (B)(1) (C)(1) OF THIS SECTION IS VALID FOR 3 YEARS.
(E) IF AN INSPECTION UNDER THIS SECTION IDENTIFIES A FAILING ON–SITE
WASTEWATER SYSTEM, THE OWNER OF THE PROPERTY SHALL NOTIFY THE
DELEGATED APPROVAL AUTHORITY:
(1) ABOUT THE FAILURE; AND
(2) WHEN THE SYSTEM IS FIXED.
Chapter 419 of the Acts of 2022
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Environment
[9–217.2.
(a) In this section, “license holder” means an individual who holds a valid on–site
wastewater property transfer inspection license issued by the Department under this
section.
(b) This section does not apply to an individual who inspects an on–site sewage
disposal system as a part of the individual’s duties as an employee of the federal
government, the State, or any local government of the State.

HOUSE BILL 747
(c) On or after July 1, 2022, an individual may not engage in the business of
inspecting an on–site sewage disposal system unless the individual holds a valid on–site
wastewater property transfer inspection license issued by the Department.
(d) (1) On or before January 1, 2022, the Department shall adopt regulations
establishing eligibility criteria, minimum training standards for on–site wastewater
property transfer inspection licenses, the frequency with which licenses must be renewed,
and the fees for license applications and renewals.
(2) The regulations adopted under this subsection shall require that:
(i) The training include instruction on determining whether an
on–site sewage disposal system is:
1. In need of replacement or repair; and
2. Not in compliance with statutory or regulatory
requirements; and
(ii) Each inspection performed by a license holder follows the
inspection format provided by the Department.
(e) An applicant for a license under this section shall:
(1) Submit an application to the Department on the form the Department
provides; and
(2) Pay an application fee set by the Department.
(f) (1) An individual who violates a provision of this section or any regulation
adopted under this section is subject to an administrative penalty not exceeding $10,000.
(2) Each on–site sewage disposal system that an individual knowingly
inspects without a valid on–site wastewater property transfer inspection license constitutes
a separate violation of this section.
(3) Any administrative penalty collected by the Department under this
subsection shall be paid into the separate account within the Bay Restoration Fund
established under § 9–1605.2(h) of this title.
(g) A local government may establish additional requirements for inspections of
on–site sewage disposal systems.]
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before July 1, [2025]
2027, the Department of the Environment, in consultation with the State Board of

HOUSE BILL 747 7
On–Site Wastewater Professionals, shall adopt regulations to implement Section 2 of this
Act.
SECTION 7. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before July 1, [2026]
2028, all individuals who provide on–site wastewater services in the State shall be licensed
by the State Board of On–Site Wastewater Professionals.
SECTION 8. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 3 of this Act shall take
effect June 30, [2025] 2027.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act may not be
interpreted to limit a mortgage company or financial institution from requiring an
inspection of an on–site wastewater system as part of contract terms for the sale or transfer
of real property.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October June 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.